Mississippi, session 2026, HB1396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following section shall be codified as Section 11-68-1, Mississippi Code of 1972: 11-68-1.  Short title.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Asbestos Action Over-Naming Reform Act." SECTION 2.  The following section shall be codified as Section 11-68-3, Mississippi Code of 1972: 11-68-3.  Definitions. The following words and phrases as used in this chapter have the meaning ascribed to them in this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Asbestos" means the same as in Section 11-67-5. (b)  "Asbestos action" means the same as in Section 11-67-5. SECTION 3.  The following section shall be codified as Section 11-68-5, Mississippi Code of 1972: 11-68-5.  Required disclosures by the plaintiff.  (1)  In addition to the disclosure requirements provided in Section 11-67-7, within thirty (30) days after an asbestos action is filed, the plaintiff shall file a sworn statement specifying the basis for each claim against each defendant in addition to any disclosures required by Section 11-67-7.  The sworn statement required by this section shall include all of the following: (a)  The name, date of birth, marital status, occupation, smoking history, current and past residences and worksites, and current and past employers of the plaintiff, and any person through whom the plaintiff alleges exposure to asbestos; (b)  The name and address of each person who is knowledgeable about each exposure and the plaintiff's relationship to that person; (c)  The manufacturer or seller and brand and trade name of each asbestos-containing product to which the plaintiff was exposed or the other person was exposed if exposure was through another person; (d)  The sites and the location at the sites that establish the direct connection between the plaintiff, or the other person if exposure was through another person, and each defendant; (e)  The beginning and ending dates of each exposure; (f)  The asbestos-related disease that is alleged; (g)  If the plaintiff has filed any prior asbestos action, information as to the case name, case number, and court for each prior asbestos action; and (h)  All supporting documentation relating to the information required in this section. (2)  A plaintiff shall supplement the information required by this section when the plaintiff receives information that is required to be disclosed or becomes aware that a prior disclosure was inaccurate or incomplete. SECTION 4.  The following section shall be codified as Section 11-68-7, Mississippi Code of 1972: 11-68-7.  Dismissal of asbestos action without prejudice.  The court, on motion by a defendant, may dismiss the asbestos action against any defendant whose product or premises is not identified in the disclosures required by Section 11-78-5, or if the plaintiff fails to comply with this chapter. SECTION 5.  Section 11-67-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 11-67-7.  Required disclosures by the plaintiff.  (1)  In addition to any other disclosures required by law, within thirty (30) days after an asbestos action is filed, or by August 1, 2017, whichever is later, the plaintiff shall do all of the following: (a)  Provide the court and parties with a sworn statement signed by the plaintiff, under penalties of perjury, that all asbestos trust claims that can be made by the plaintiff have been filed and that includes the following: (i)  A statement that an investigation of all asbestos trust claims has been conducted; (ii)  A list identifying each asbestos trust claim that has been filed by the plaintiff; (iii)  A list identifying each asbestos trust claim that can be made by the plaintiff, which has not been filed for the sole permissible reason that the cost of submitting an asbestos trust claim exceeds the plaintiff's reasonably anticipated recovery; and (iv)  Whether there has been a request to defer, delay, suspend, toll, withdraw, or otherwise alter the standing of any asbestos trust claim, and provide the status and disposition of each asbestos trust claim. (b)  Provide all parties with all trust materials, including trust materials that relate to conditions other than those that are the basis for the asbestos action and including all trust materials from all law firms connected to the plaintiff in relation to exposure to asbestos, including anyone at a law firm involved in the asbestos action, any referring law firm, and any other firm that has filed an asbestos trust claim for the plaintiff.  Documents should be accompanied by a custodial affidavit from the asbestos trust, certifying that the trust materials submitted to defendants are true and complete. (c)  If the plaintiff's asbestos trust claim is based on secondary exposure to asbestos through another individual or individuals, the plaintiff shall produce all trust materials submitted by the other individual or individuals to any asbestos trusts if the materials are available to the plaintiff or the plaintiff's counsel. (2)  The plaintiff has a continuing duty to supplement the information and materials required under subsection (1) and the supplementation shall be made no later than thirty (30) days after the plaintiff supplements an existing asbestos trust claim, receives additional information or materials related to an asbestos trust claim, or files an additional asbestos trust claim. (3)  The court may dismiss the asbestos action if the plaintiff fails to comply with this section. (4)  An asbestos action may not be set for trial until at least one hundred eighty (180) days after the requirements of subsection (1) are met. (5)  Not less than thirty (30) days before trial in an asbestos action, the court shall enter into the record a document that identifies every asbestos trust claim made by the plaintiff. SECTION 6.  Section 11-67-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 11-67-9.  Identification of additional asbestos trust claims by defendant; trust record.  (1)  A defendant may file a motion requesting a stay of the proceeding on or before the later of the sixtieth (60th) day before the date of trial in the action is set to commence or any other such time for which the defendant has a good faith reasonable basis to request a stay.  The motion shall identify the asbestos trust claims not previously identified that the defendant believes the plaintiff can file and include information supporting the asbestos trust claims. (2)  Within ten (10) days of receiving the defendant's motion, the plaintiff shall: (a)  File the asbestos trust claims; or (b)  File a written response with the court requesting a determination that the cost to file the asbestos trust claims exceeds the plaintiff's reasonably anticipated recovery. (3)  (a)  Subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), if the court determines that there is a basis for the plaintiff to file an asbestos trust claim identified in the motion to stay, the court shall stay the asbestos action until the plaintiff files the asbestos trust claim and produces all related trust claims materials. (b)  If the court determines that the cost of submitting an asbestos trust claim exceeds the plaintiff's reasonably anticipated recovery, the court shall stay the asbestos action until the plaintiff files with the court and provides all parties with a verified statement of the plaintiff's history of exposure, usage, or other connection to asbestos covered by that asbestos trust. (4)  An asbestos action may not be set for trial until at least sixty (60) days after the plaintiff complies with the requirements of this section. SECTION 7.  Section 11-67-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 11-67-11.  Discovery; use of materials.  (1)  Trust materials and trust governance documents are presumed to be relevant and authentic, and are admissible in evidence in an asbestos action.  A claim of privilege does not apply to any trust materials or trust governance documents. (2)  A defendant in an asbestos action may seek discovery from an asbestos trust.  The plaintiff may not claim privilege or confidentiality to bar discovery and shall provide consent at the time of asbestos trust identification, including, but not limited to, authorization for release of trust materials or other expression of permission that may be required by the asbestos trust to release information and materials sought by a defendant. (3)  Trust materials that are sufficient to entitle a claim to consideration for payment under the applicable trust governance documents are sufficient to support a jury finding that the plaintiff was exposed to products for which the trust was established to provide compensation and that, under applicable law, such exposure is a substantial contributing factor in causing the plaintiff's injury that is at issue in the asbestos action. SECTION 8.  The following section shall be codified as Section 11-68-9, Mississippi Code of 1972: 11-68-9.  Application. This act shall apply to all asbestos actions filed on or after July 1, 2026. SECTION 9. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.